District of Columbia statutes.
42-3404.31

District’s opportunity to purchase certain housing accommodations.

(a)

Before an owner of a housing accommodation may sell a housing accommodation comprised of 5 or more units, the owner shall provide to the Mayor, on behalf of the District, and the Mayor shall have, an opportunity to purchase the housing accommodation in the same manner, except as otherwise provided by this subchapter, as the opportunity to purchase is provided to a tenant under subchapter IV of this chapter.

(b)

The Mayor may assign the opportunity to purchase pursuant to § 42-3404.36.

(c)

The Mayor shall have the same remedies and rights to enforce owner compliance with this chapter as a tenant or tenant organization would have against an owner for violation of this chapter.

History

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 431
as added Dec. 24, 2008, D.C. Law 17-286, § 2, 55 DCR 11989

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Rulemaking Authority under the District’s Opportunity to Purchase Amendment Act of 2008, see Mayor’s Order 2010-157, October 8, 2010 ( 57 DCR 9556).